Utah statutes.
58-68-805.   Supervision of cosmetic medical procedures.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an osteopathic physician and surgeon may not delegate the performance of an ablative cosmetic medical procedure to an individual who is not licensed under this chapter or Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act.

(2)  A physician may delegate to an advanced practice registered nurse with an unrestricted license under Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, the performance of an erbium full ablation resurfacing procedure or a CO2 fractionated resurfacing procedure, if the physician:

(a)  prescribes that specific procedure for the patient who is to receive the procedure;

(b)  ensures that the advanced practice registered nurse performs the procedure under the indirect supervision of the physician; and

(c)  verifies that the advanced practice registered nurse is qualified to perform the procedure by having received at least 50 hours of training specific to the procedure to be performed and the laser to be used.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2012 General Session

